Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.020

Powers of deputies, regular and special.

Every deputy sheriff shall possess all the power, and may perform any of the duties, prescribed by law to be performed by the sheriff, and shall serve or execute, according to law, all process, writs, precepts, and orders, issued by lawful authority.

Persons may also be deputed by the sheriff in writing to do particular acts; including the service of process in civil or criminal cases, and the sheriff shall be responsible on his or her official bond for their default or misconduct.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4051; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.020. Prior: 1961 c 35 s 2; prior: (i) Code 1881 s 2767, part; 1871 p 110 s 1, part; 1863 p 557 s 2, part; 1854 p 434 s 2, part; RRS s 4160, part. (ii) 1886 p 174 s 1; Code 1881 s 2768; 1863 p 557 s 3; 1854 p 434 s 3; RRS s 4167.]